pl: Akcesoria bębna gadającego w zestawie: Pałka / bijak (zakrzywiony); Torba / pokrowiec do przenoszenia; Materiały szkoleniowe / instrukcje; Pasek na ramię; Zapasowe sznurki; Narzędzie / klucz do strojenia; Inne
cs: Součástí dodávky je příslušenství pro mluvící bubny: Palička (zakřivená); Přepravní taška/pouzdro; Výukové materiály; Ramenní popruh; Náhradní lanka; Ladicí nástroj/klíč; Jiné
en: Talking drum accessories included: Beater/striker (curved stick); Carrying bag/case; Instruction/lesson material; Shoulder strap; Spare cords; Tuning tool/key; Other
pt-BR: Tambor falante acessórios incluídos: Baqueta/batedor (bastão curvo); Bolsa de transporte/estojo; Material de instrução/aula; Alça de ombro; Cordas sobressalentes; Ferramenta/chave de afinação; Outros
nb: Inkludert tilbehør til klemtromme: Klubbe/stikke (buet pinne); Bæreveske/koffert; Undervisningsmateriell; Skulderstropp; Ekstra snorer; Stemmeverktøy/-nøkkel; Annet
it: Accessori del tamburo parlante inclusi: Battente (bastone curvo); Borsa per il trasporto/custodia; Materiale didattico/di istruzione; Tracolla; Corde di ricambio; Strumento/chiave per accordatura; Altro
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia je príslušenstvo pre hovoriace bubny: Palička/úderník (zahnutá palica); Taška na prenášanie/puzdro; Inštruktážne materiály; Ramenný popruh; Náhradné šnúry; Ladiaci nástroj/kľúč; Iné
lt-LT: Įtraukti talking drum priedai: Muštukas (lenkta lazdelė); Nešiojimo krepšys / dėklas; Instrukcijos / mokomoji medžiaga; Petneša / diržas per petį; Atsarginės virvutės; Derinimo įrankis / raktas; Kita
sl-SI: Vključeni dodatki za govoreči boben: Tolkalo/udarjalka (ukrivljena palica); Torba/kovček za prenašanje; Gradivo z navodili/lekcijami; Naramni trak; Rezervne vrvice; Orodje/ključ za uglaševanje; Drugo
vi: Bao gồm phụ kiện trống nói.: Dùi đánh (gậy cong); Túi/hộp đựng; Tài liệu hướng dẫn/bài học; Dây đeo vai; Dây thay thế; Dụng cụ/khóa chỉnh âm; Khác
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за говорещи барабани: Бухалка/палка (извита пръчка); Чанта/калъф за носене; Материали за инструкции/уроци; Лента за рамо; Резервни въжета; Инструмент/ключ за настройка; Друго
zh-CN: 说话鼓所含配件: 鼓槌/敲击槌（弯棍）; 便携袋/盒; 教学/课程材料; 肩带; 备用拉绳; 调音工具/扳手; 其他
fi: Talking drum -rummun mukana toimitettavat tarvikkeet: Nuija/kapula (käyrä keppi); Kantokassi/kotelo; Opetusmateriaali; Olkahihna; Varanyörit; Viritystyökalu/-avain; Muu
fr: Accessoires inclus avec le tambour parlant: Batte/baguette (bâton courbé); Sac/étui de transport; Matériel d’instruction/de leçon; Bandoulière; Cordes de rechange; Outil/clé d’accordage; Autre
ja: トーキングドラム付属品: ビーター/ストライカー (湾曲したバチ); キャリーバッグ/ケース; 説明書/教則本; ショルダーストラップ; 交換用コード; チューニングツール/キー; その他
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมกลองพูดได้รวมอยู่ด้วย: ไม้ตี (ไม้โค้ง); กระเป๋า/เคสพกพา; เอกสารแนะนำ/บทเรียน; สายสะพายไหล่; สายสำรอง; เครื่องมือ/ประแจตั้งเสียง; อื่นๆ
nl: Talking drum meegeleverde accessoires: Slagstokje (gebogen); Draagtas/-koffer; Instructie-/lesmateriaal; Schouderband; Reservekoorden; Stemgereedschap/-sleutel; Overig
da: Medfølgende tilbehør til talking drum: Kølle (buet stik); Bæretaske/etui; Undervisningsmateriale; Skulderrem; Ekstra snore; Stemmeværktøj/-nøgle; Andet
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für die Talking Drum: Schlägel (gebogener Stock); Tragetasche/Koffer; Unterrichtsmaterial; Schultergurt; Ersatzschnüre; Stimmwerkzeug/-schlüssel; Sonstige
zh-TW: 包含說話鼓配件: 鼓槌/打擊棒 (彎曲鼓槌); 攜行袋/盒; 教學/課程教材; 肩背帶; 備用鼓繩; 調音工具/扳手; 其他
hr-HR: Pribor za govoreće bubnjeve uključen: Udaraljka (zakrivljeni štap); Torba/kovčeg za nošenje; Materijali za učenje; Remen za rame; Rezervne vrpce; Alat/ključ za ugađanje; Ostalo
es: Accesorios para el tambor parlante incluidos: Maza/baqueta (palo curvo); Estuche/bolsa de transporte; Material de instrucción/lecciones; Correa de hombro; Cuerdas de repuesto; Herramienta/llave de afinación; Otros
tr: Dahil olan konuşan davul aksesuarları.: Tokmak/vurucu (kıvrık çubuk); Taşıma çantası/kılıfı; Eğitim/ders materyali; Omuz askısı; Yedek kordon; Akort aleti/anahtarı; Diğer
pt-PT: Acessórios incluídos no tambor falante: Batedor/baqueta (pau curvo); Saco/estojo de transporte; Material de instrução/aulas; Alça de ombro; Cordas sobresselentes; Ferramenta/chave de afinação; Outro
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ για τύμπανα με ομιλία: Μπαγκέτα/κόπανος (κυρτό ραβδί); Τσάντα/θήκη μεταφοράς; Υλικό οδηγιών/μαθημάτων; Λουρί ώμου; Εφεδρικά κορδόνια; Εργαλείο/κλειδί κουρδίσματος; Άλλο
ru: Аксессуары говорящего барабана в комплекте: Колотушка (изогнутая палочка); Сумка/чехол для переноски; Обучающие материалы; Плечевой ремень; Запасные шнуры; Ключ для настройки; Другое
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse cu toba vorbitoare: Ciocănel (băț curbat); Geantă/husă de transport; Materiale de instruire/lecții; Curea de umăr; Corzi de rezervă; Unealtă/cheie de acordare; Altele
hu: Beszélő dob tartozékai: Ütő (hajlított pálca); Hordtáska / tok; Oktatóanyag; Vállpánt; Tartalék zsinórok; Hangolókulcs / szerszám; Egyéb
ko: 토킹 드럼 포함 액세서리: 비터/스트라이커(곡선형 스틱); 캐링 백/케이스; 지침/레슨 자료; 숄더 스트랩; 여분 코드; 튜닝 도구/키; 기타
sv: Tillbehör för talande trummor ingår: Klubba (böjd pinne); Bärväska/fodral; Instruktions-/lektionsmaterial; Axelrem; Reservsnören; Stämverktyg/nyckel; Annat